test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tikka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - tikká: # á-stems
    tikká+N+Sg+Nom: tikká
    tikká+N+Sg+Gen: tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Acc: tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Ill: tiikán
    tikká+N+Sg+Loc: tikkáást
    tikká+N+Sg+Com: tikkáin
    tikká+N+Sg+Abe: tikáttáá
    tikká+N+Ess: tikkán
    tikká+N+Par: tikkád
    tikká+N+Pl+Nom: tikáh
    tikká+N+Pl+Gen: tikái
    tikká+N+Pl+Acc: tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Ill: tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Loc: tikkáin
    tikká+N+Pl+Com: tikáiguin
    tikká+N+Pl+Abe: tikáittáá
